test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-lla_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that belong to LEXICON ÁLLA, ÆLLA and SJONÁLLA. All the adjectives are loan words that have been adapted to lulesami.

Tests:

  Adjective - antisosiálla: #  ÁLLA
    antisosiálla+A+Attr: [antisosiála, antisosiálalasj]
    antisosiálla+A+Sg+Nom: [antisosiálla, antisosiálalasj]
    antisosiálla+A+Sg+Gen: [antisosiála, antisosiálalattja]
    antisosiálla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [antisosiálalabbo, antisosiálap]
    antisosiálla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [antisosiálalamos,antisosiálamus ]
    antisosiálla+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [antisosiálalattjat]
    antisosiálla+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - aspektuálla: # ÁLLA
    aspektuælla+A+Attr: [aspektuella, aspektuellalasj] 
    aspektuælla+A+Sg+Nom: [aspektuælla, aspektuälla, aspektuellalasj]
    aspektuælla+A+Sg+Acc: [aspektuellav, aspektuellalattjav]
    aspektuælla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [aspektuellalabbo, aspektuellap]
    aspektuælla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [aspektuellalamos, aspektuellamus]
    aspektuælla+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [aspektuellalattjat]
    aspektuælla+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - paralælla: # ÆLLA
    paralælla+A+Attr: [paralella, paralellalasj]
    paralælla+A+Sg+Nom: [paralælla, paralälla, paralellalasj]
    paralælla+A+Sg+Gen: [paralella, paralellalattja]
    paralælla+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [paralellalabbo, paralellap]
    paralælla+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [paralellalamos, paralellamus]
